California statutes. Probate Code
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, within 24 hours of the arrival in the emergency department of a general acute care hospital of a patient who is unconscious or otherwise incapable of communication, the hospital shall make reasonable efforts to contact the patient’s agent, surrogate, or a family member or other person the hospital reasonably believes has the authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient. A hospital shall be deemed to have made reasonable efforts, and to have discharged its duty under this section, if it does all of the following:

(1) Examines the personal effects, if any, accompanying the patient and any medical records regarding the patient in its possession, and reviews any verbal or written report made by emergency medical technicians or the police, to identify the name of any agent, surrogate, or a family member or other person the hospital reasonably believes has the authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient.

(2) Contacts or attempts to contact any agent, surrogate, or a family member or other person the hospital reasonably believes has the authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient, as identified in paragraph (1).

(3) Contacts the Secretary of State directly or indirectly, including by voice mail or facsimile, to inquire whether the patient has registered an advance health care directive with the Advance Health Care Directive Registry, if the hospital finds evidence of the patient’s Advance Health Care Directive Registry identification card either from the patient or from the patient’s family or authorized agent.

(b) The hospital shall document in the patient’s medical record all efforts made to contact any agent, surrogate, or a family member or other person the hospital reasonably believes has the authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient.

(c) Application of this section shall be suspended during any period in which the hospital implements its disaster and mass casualty program, or its fire and internal disaster program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4716 (as added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 329) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 882, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Duties of Health Care Providers [4730. - 4736.]

4730.

Before implementing a health care decision made for a patient, a supervising health care provider, if possible, shall promptly communicate to the patient the decision made and the identity of the person making the decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4731.

(a) A supervising health care provider who knows of the existence of an advance health care directive, a revocation of an advance health care directive, or a designation or disqualification of a surrogate, shall promptly record its existence in the patient’s health care record and, if it is in writing, shall request a copy. If a copy is furnished, the supervising health care provider shall arrange for its maintenance in the patient’s health care record.

(b) A supervising health care provider who knows of a revocation of a power of attorney for health care or a disqualification of a surrogate shall make a reasonable effort to notify the agent or surrogate of the revocation or disqualification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4732.

A primary physician who makes or is informed of a determination that a patient lacks or has recovered capacity, or that another condition exists affecting an individual health care instruction or the authority of an agent, conservator of the person, or surrogate, shall promptly record the determination in the patient’s health care record and communicate the determination to the patient, if possible, and to a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4733.

Except as provided in Sections 4734 and 4735, a health care provider or health care institution providing care to a patient shall do the following:

(a) Comply with an individual health care instruction of the patient and with a reasonable interpretation of that instruction made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

(b) Comply with a health care decision for the patient made by a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the patient while having capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4734.

(a) A health care provider may decline to comply with an individual health care instruction or health care decision for reasons of conscience.

(b) A health care institution may decline to comply with an individual health care instruction or health care decision if the instruction or decision is contrary to a policy of the institution that is expressly based on reasons of conscience and if the policy was timely communicated to the patient or to a person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4735.

A health care provider or health care institution may decline to comply with an individual health care instruction or health care decision that requires medically ineffective health care or health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4736.

A health care provider or health care institution that declines to comply with an individual health care instruction or health care decision shall do all of the following:

(a) Promptly so inform the patient, if possible, and any person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient.

(b) Unless the patient or person then authorized to make health care decisions for the patient refuses assistance, immediately make all reasonable efforts to assist in the transfer of the patient to another health care provider or institution that is willing to comply with the instruction or decision.

(c) Provide continuing care to the patient until a transfer can be accomplished or until it appears that a transfer cannot be accomplished. In all cases, appropriate pain relief and other palliative care shall be continued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Immunities and Liabilities [4740. - 4743.]

4740.

A health care provider or health care institution acting in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for any actions in compliance with this division, including, but not limited to, any of the following conduct:

(a) Complying with a health care decision of a person that the health care provider or health care institution believes in good faith has the authority to make a health care decision for a patient, including a decision to withhold or withdraw health care.

(b) Declining to comply with a health care decision of a person based on a belief that the person then lacked authority.

(c) Complying with an advance health care directive and assuming that the directive was valid when made and has not been revoked or terminated.

(d) Declining to comply with an individual health care instruction or health care decision, in accordance with Sections 4734 to 4736, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4741.

A person acting as agent or surrogate under this part is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for health care decisions made in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4742.

(a) A health care provider or health care institution that intentionally violates this part is subject to liability to the aggrieved individual for damages of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

(b) A person who intentionally falsifies, forges, conceals, defaces, or obliterates an individual’s advance health care directive or a revocation of an advance health care directive without the individual’s consent, or who coerces or fraudulently induces an individual to give, revoke, or not to give an advance health care directive, is subject to liability to that individual for damages of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or actual damages resulting from the action, whichever is greater, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

(c) The damages provided in this section are cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4743.

Any person who alters or forges a written advance health care directive of another, or willfully conceals or withholds personal knowledge of a revocation of an advance directive, with the intent to cause a withholding or withdrawal of health care necessary to keep the patient alive contrary to the desires of the patient, and thereby directly causes health care necessary to keep the patient alive to be withheld or withdrawn and the death of the patient thereby to be hastened, is subject to prosecution for unlawful homicide as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 187) of Title 8 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS [4750. - 4771.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4750. - 4755.]

4750.

Subject to this division:

(a) An advance health care directive is effective and exercisable free of judicial intervention.

(b) A health care decision made by an agent for a principal is effective without judicial approval.

(c) A health care decision made by a surrogate for a patient is effective without judicial approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.

The remedies provided in this part are cumulative and not exclusive of any other remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4752.

Except as provided in Section 4753, this part is not subject to limitation in an advance health care directive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4753.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), an advance health care directive may expressly eliminate the authority of a person listed in Section 4765 to petition the court for any one or more of the purposes enumerated in Section 4766, if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The advance directive is executed by an individual having the advice of a lawyer authorized to practice law in the state where the advance directive is executed.

(2) The individual’s lawyer signs a certificate stating in substance:
“I am a lawyer authorized to practice law in the state where this advance health care directive was executed, and __________ [insert name] was my client at the time this advance directive was executed. I have advised my client concerning his or her rights in connection with this advance directive and the applicable law and the consequences of signing or not signing this advance directive, and my client, after being so advised, has executed this advance directive.”

(b) An advance health care directive may not limit the authority of the following persons to petition under this part:

(1) The conservator of the person, with respect to a petition relating to an advance directive, for a purpose specified in subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 4766.

(2) The agent, with respect to a petition relating to a power of attorney for health care, for a purpose specified in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 4766.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4754.

There is no right to a jury trial in proceedings under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4755.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the general provisions in Division 3 (commencing with Section 1000) apply to proceedings under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Jurisdiction and Venue [4760. - 4763.]

4760.

(a) The superior court has jurisdiction in proceedings under this division.

(b) The court in proceedings under this division is a court of general jurisdiction and the court, or a judge of the court, has the same power and authority with respect to the proceedings as otherwise provided by law for a superior court, or a judge of the superior court, including, but not limited to, the matters authorized by Section 128 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4761.

The court may exercise jurisdiction in proceedings under this division on any basis permitted by Section 410.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4762.

Without limiting Section 4761, a person who acts as an agent under a power of attorney for health care or as a surrogate under this division is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to matters relating to acts and transactions of the agent or surrogate performed in this state or affecting a patient in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4763.

The proper county for commencement of a proceeding under this division shall be determined in the following order of priority:

(a) The county in which the patient resides.

(b) The county in which the agent or surrogate resides.

(c) Any other county that is in the patient’s best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Petitions and Orders [4765. - 4771.]

4765.

Subject to Section 4753, a petition may be filed under this part by any of the following persons:

(a) The patient.

(b) The patient’s spouse, unless legally separated.

(c) A relative of the patient.

(d) The patient’s agent or surrogate.

(e) The conservator of the person of the patient.

(f) The court investigator, described in Section 1454, of the county where the patient resides.

(g) The public guardian of the county where the patient resides.

(h) The supervising health care provider or health care institution involved with the patient’s care.

(i) Any other interested person or friend of the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4766.

A petition may be filed under this part for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) Determining whether or not the patient has capacity to make health care decisions.

(b) Determining whether an advance health care directive is in effect or has terminated.

(c) Determining whether the acts or proposed acts of an agent or surrogate are consistent with the patient’s desires as expressed in an advance health care directive or otherwise made known to the court or, where the patient’s desires are unknown or unclear, whether the acts or proposed acts of the agent or surrogate are in the patient’s best interest.

(d) Declaring that the authority of an agent or surrogate is terminated, upon a determination by the court that the agent or surrogate has made a health care decision for the patient that authorized anything illegal or upon a determination by the court of both of the following:

(1) The agent or surrogate has violated, has failed to perform, or is unfit to perform, the duty under an advance health care directive to act consistent with the patient’s desires or, where the patient’s desires are unknown or unclear, is acting (by action or inaction) in a manner that is clearly contrary to the patient’s best interest.

(2) At the time of the determination by the court, the patient lacks the capacity to execute or to revoke an advance health care directive or disqualify a surrogate.

(e) Compelling a third person to honor individual health care instructions or the authority of an agent or surrogate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 230, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4767.

A proceeding under this part is commenced by filing a petition stating facts showing that the petition is authorized under this part, the grounds of the petition, and, if known to the petitioner, the terms of any advance health care directive in question.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4768.

The court may dismiss a petition if it appears that the proceeding is not reasonably necessary for the protection of the interests of the patient and shall stay or dismiss the proceeding in whole or in part when required by Section 410.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4769.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), at least 15 days before the time set for hearing, the petitioner shall serve notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, on the following:

(1) The agent or surrogate, if not the petitioner.

(2) The patient, if not the petitioner.

(b) In the case of a petition to compel a third person to honor individual health care instructions or the authority of an agent or surrogate, notice of the time and place of the hearing, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the third person in the manner provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 230, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4770.

The court in its discretion, on a showing of good cause, may issue a temporary order prescribing the health care of the patient until the disposition of the petition filed under Section 4766. If a power of attorney for health care is in effect and a conservator (including a temporary conservator) of the person is appointed for the principal, the court that appoints the conservator in its discretion, on a showing of good cause, may issue a temporary order prescribing the health care of the principal, the order to continue in effect for the period ordered by the court but in no case longer than the period necessary to permit the filing and determination of a petition filed under Section 4766.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4771.

In a proceeding under this part commenced by the filing of a petition by a person other than the agent or surrogate, the court may in its discretion award reasonable attorney’s fees to one of the following:

(a) The agent or surrogate, if the court determines that the proceeding was commenced without any reasonable cause.

(b) The person commencing the proceeding, if the court determines that the agent or surrogate has clearly violated the duties under the advance health care directive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. REQUEST REGARDING RESUSCITATIVE MEASURES [4780. - 4786.]

4780.

(a) As used in this part:

(1) “Request regarding resuscitative measures” means a written document, signed by (A) an individual with capacity, or a legally recognized health care decisionmaker, and (B) the individual’s physician, that directs a health care provider regarding resuscitative measures. A request regarding resuscitative measures is not an advance health care directive.

(2) “Request regarding resuscitative measures” includes one, or both of, the following:

(A) A prehospital “do not resuscitate” form as developed by the Emergency Medical Services Authority or other substantially similar
 form.

(B) A Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form, as approved by the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(3) “Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form” means a request regarding resuscitative measures that directs a health care provider regarding resuscitative and life-sustaining measures.

(b) A legally recognized health care decisionmaker may execute the Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form only if the individual lacks capacity, or the individual has designated that the decisionmaker’s authority is effective pursuant to Section 4682.

(c) The Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form and medical intervention and procedures offered by the form shall be explained by a health care provider, as defined in
 Section 4621. The form shall be completed by a health care provider based on patient preferences and medical indications, and signed by a physician, or a nurse practitioner or a physician assistant acting under the supervision of the physician and within the scope of practice authorized by law, and the patient or his or her legally recognized health care decisionmaker. The health care provider, during the process of completing the Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form, should inform the patient about the difference between an advance health care directive and the Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form.

(d) An individual having capacity may revoke a Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form at any time and in any manner that communicates an intent to revoke, consistent with Section 4695.

(e) A request regarding resuscitative measures may also be evidenced by a medallion engraved with the words “do not resuscitate” or the letters “DNR,” a patient identification number, and a 24-hour toll-free telephone number, issued by a person pursuant to an agreement with the Emergency Medical Services Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (AB 637)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.

As used in this part, “health care provider” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Persons described in Section 4621.

(b) Emergency response employees, including, but not limited to, firefighters, law enforcement officers, emergency medical technicians I and II, paramedics, and employees and volunteer members of legally organized and recognized volunteer organizations, who are trained in accordance with standards adopted as regulations by the Emergency Medical Services Authority pursuant to Sections 1797.170, 1797.171, 1797.172, 1797.182, and 1797.183 of the Health and Safety Code to respond to medical emergencies in the course of performing their volunteer or employee duties with the organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.2.

(a) A health care provider shall treat an individual in accordance with a Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if the Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form requires medically ineffective health care or health care contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the health care provider or institution.

(c) A physician may conduct an evaluation of the individual and, if possible, in consultation with the individual, or the individual’s legally recognized health care decisionmaker, issue a new order consistent with the most current information available about the individual’s health status and goals of care.

(d) The legally recognized health care decisionmaker of an individual without capacity shall consult with the physician who is, at that time, the individual’s treating physician prior to making a request to modify that individual’s Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form.

(e) An individual with capacity may, at any time, request alternative treatment to that treatment that was ordered on the form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.4.

If the orders in an individual’s request regarding resuscitative measures directly conflict with his or her individual health care instruction, as defined in Section 4623, then, to the extent of the conflict, the most recent order or instruction is effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4781.5.

The legally recognized health care decisionmaker shall make health care decisions pursuant to this part in accordance with Sections 4684 and 4714.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4782.

A health care provider who honors a request regarding resuscitative measures is not subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, discipline for unprofessional conduct, administrative sanction, or any other sanction, as a result of his or her reliance on the request, if the health care provider (a) believes in good faith that the action or decision is consistent with this part, and (b) has no knowledge that the action or decision would be inconsistent with a health care decision that the individual signing the request would have made on his or her own behalf under like circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4783.

(a) Forms for requests regarding resuscitative measures printed after January 1, 1995, shall contain the following:
“By signing this form, the legally recognized health care decisionmaker acknowledges that this request regarding resuscitative measures is consistent with the known desires of, and with the best interest of, the individual who is the subject of the form.”

(b) A printed form substantially similar to that described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4780 is valid and enforceable if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The form is signed by the individual, or the individual’s legally recognized health care decisionmaker, and a physician.

(2) The form directs health care providers regarding resuscitative measures.

(3) The form contains all other information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4784.

In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, a health care provider may presume that a request regarding resuscitative measures is valid and unrevoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4785.

This part applies regardless of whether the individual executing a request regarding resuscitative measures is within or outside a hospital or other health care institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 266, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4786.

This part does not repeal or narrow laws relating to health care decisionmaking.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVE REGISTRY [4800. - 4806.]

4800.

(a) The Secretary of State shall establish a registry system through which a person who has executed a written advance health care directive may register in a central information center, information regarding the advance directive, making that information available upon request to any health care provider, the public guardian, or the legal representative of the registrant. A request for information pursuant to this section shall state the need for the information.

(b) The Secretary of State shall respond by the close of business on the next business day to a request for information made pursuant to Section 4717 by the emergency department of a general acute care hospital.

(c) Information that may be received is limited to the registrant’s name, social security number, driver’s license number, or other individual identifying number established by law, if any, address, date and place of birth, the registrant’s advance health care directive, an intended place of deposit or safekeeping of a written advance health care directive, and the name and telephone number of the agent and any alternative agent. Information that may be released upon request may not include the registrant’s social security number except when necessary to verify the identity of the registrant.

(d) When the Secretary of State receives information from a registrant, the secretary shall issue the registrant an Advance Health Care Directive Registry identification card indicating that an advance health care directive, or information regarding an advance health care directive, has been deposited with the registry. Costs associated with issuance of the card shall be offset by the fee charged by the Secretary of State to receive and register information at the registry.

(e) The Secretary of State, at the request of the registrant or his or her legal representative, shall transmit the information received regarding the written advance health care directive to the registry system of another jurisdiction as identified by the registrant, or his or her legal representative.

(f) The Secretary of State shall charge a fee to each registrant in an amount such that, when all fees charged to registrants are aggregated, the aggregated fees do not exceed the actual cost of establishing and maintaining the registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 882, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4801.

The Secretary of State shall establish procedures to verify the identities of health care providers, the public guardian, and other authorized persons requesting information pursuant to Section 4800. No fee shall be charged to any health care provider, the public guardian, or other authorized person requesting information pursuant to Section 4800.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4802.

The Secretary of State shall establish procedures to advise each registrant of the following:

(a) A health care provider may not honor a written advance health care directive until it receives a copy from the registrant.

(b) Each registrant must notify the registry upon revocation of the advance directive.

(c) Each registrant must reregister upon execution of a subsequent advance directive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4803.

Failure to register with the Secretary of State does not affect the validity of any advance health care directive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4804.

Registration with the Secretary of State does not affect the ability of the registrant to revoke the registrant’s advance health care directive or a later executed advance directive, nor does registration raise any presumption of validity or superiority among any competing advance directives or revocations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 658, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2000, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to affect the duty of a health care provider to provide information to a patient regarding advance health care directives pursuant to any provision of federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 882, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4806.

(a) The Secretary of State shall work with the State Department of Health Services and the office of the Attorney General to develop information about end of life care, advance health care directives, and registration of the advance health care directives at the registry established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4800. This information shall be developed utilizing existing information developed by the office of the Attorney General.

(b) Links to the information specified in subdivision (a) and to the registry shall be available on the Web sites of the Secretary of State, the State Department of Health Services, the office of the Attorney General, the Department of Managed Health Care, the Department of Insurance, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Medical Board of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. NONPROBATE TRANSFERS [5000. - 5705.]



PART 1. PROVISIONS RELATING TO EFFECT OF DEATH [5000. - 5048.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5000. - 5003.]

5000.

(a) A provision for a nonprobate transfer on death in an insurance policy, contract of employment, bond, mortgage, promissory note, certificated or uncertificated security, account agreement, custodial agreement, deposit agreement, compensation plan, pension plan, individual retirement plan, employee benefit plan, trust, conveyance, deed of gift, revocable transfer on death deed, marital property agreement, or other written instrument of a similar nature is not invalid because the instrument does not comply with the requirements for execution of a will, and this code does not invalidate the instrument.

(b) Included within subdivision (a) are the
 following:

(1) A written provision that moneys or other benefits due to, controlled by, or owned by a decedent before death shall be paid after the decedent’s death to a person whom the decedent designates either in the instrument or in a separate writing, including a will, executed either before or at the same time as the instrument, or later.

(2) A written provision that moneys due or to become due under the instrument shall cease to be payable in the event of the death of the promisee or the promisor before payment or demand.

(3) A written provision that any property controlled by or owned by the decedent before death that is the subject of the instrument shall pass to a person whom the decedent designates either in
 the
 instrument or in a separate writing, including a will, executed either before or at the same time as the instrument, or later.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the rights of creditors under any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 293, Sec. 8.   (AB 139)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, a holder of property under an instrument of a type described in Section 5000 is not required to receive, hold, or transfer the property in compliance with a provision for a nonprobate transfer on death executed by a person who has an interest in the property if either (1) the person is not authorized by the terms of the instrument to execute a provision for transfer of the property, or (2) the provision for transfer of the property does not otherwise satisfy the terms of the instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 51, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

(a) A holder of property under an instrument of a type described in Section 5000 may transfer the property in compliance with a provision for a nonprobate transfer on death that satisfies the terms of the instrument, whether or not the transfer is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the property as between the person who executed the provision for transfer of the property and other persons having an interest in the property or their successors, and whether or not the transfer is consistent with the rights of the person named as beneficiary.

(b) Except as provided in this subdivision, no notice or other information shown to have been available to the holder of the property affects the right of the holder to the protection provided by subdivision (a). The protection provided by subdivision (a) does not extend to a transfer made after either of the following events:

(1) The holder of the property has been served with a contrary court order.

(2) The holder of the property has been served with a written notice of a person claiming an adverse interest in the property. However, this paragraph does not apply to a pension plan to the extent the transfer is a periodic payment pursuant to the plan.
